test/src/morphology/N-laanga_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lānga: # Noun 33 'eng /est lõng/fin' - full paradigm
     lānga+N+Sg+Nom: lānga
     lānga+N+Sg+Gen: lānga
     lānga+N+Sg+Par: langõ
     lānga+N+Sg+Dat: lāngan
     lānga+N+Sg+Ins: lāngaks
     lānga+N+Sg+Ill: langõ
     lānga+N+Sg+Ela: lāngast
     lānga+N+Pl+Nom: lāngad
     lānga+N+Pl+Gen: lāngad
     lānga+N+Pl+Par: langi
     lānga+N+Pl+Dat: lāngadõn
     lānga+N+Pl+Ins: lāngadõks
     lānga+N+Pl+Ill: langži
     lānga+N+Pl+Ela: langšti 
